Utah statutes.
77-30-26.5.   Person who has violated parole or probation agreement with
demanding state.
(1)  A law enforcement agency that is holding a person subject to extradition
based on having allegedly violated the terms of the person's probation,
parole, bail, or other terms of release in the demanding state shall
immediately release the person to the authorized agent of the demanding state.
A governor's warrant is not required in order to return the person if:
(a)  the person has previously signed a waiver of extradition as a term of the
person's probation, parole, bail, or other terms of release in the demanding
state;
(b)  the law enforcement agency holding the person has received:
(i)  an authenticated copy of the prior waiver of extradition signed by the
person; and
(ii)  a photograph and fingerprints identifying the person as the person who
signed the waiver.
(2)  Utah may, prior to releasing a person to the authorized agent of the
demanding state, prosecute the person for any criminal offense committed in
Utah.
(3)  This section does not affect or limit:
(a)  the right of the person sought by the demanding state to return to the
demanding state voluntarily and without governmental action;
(b)  the authority of the law enforcement or parole officers of Utah or the
demanding state; or
(c)  any procedures regarding waiver of extradition under Title 77, Chapter
30, Extradition.
